Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB640.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 2301-A(3) and (7)(i) and 2802-E(a) of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929, are amended to read:SECTION 1. ARTICLE XXIII OF THE ACT OF APRIL 9, 1929 (P.L.177, NO.175), KNOWN AS THE ADMINISTRATIVE CODE OF 1929, IS AMENDED BY ADDING SECTIONS TO READ:SECTION 2339. MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATION ASSESSMENT.--(A) THE ASSESSMENT AUTHORIZED AND IMPLEMENTED UNDER ARTICLE VIII-I OF THE ACT OF JUNE 13, 1967 (P.L.31, NO.21), KNOWN AS THE "HUMAN SERVICES CODE," SHALL CONTINUE AND REMAIN IN EFFECT TO THE EXTENT PERMITTED UNDER FEDERAL LAW. THE DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES SHALL TRANSMIT NOTICE TO THE LEGISLATIVE REFERENCE BUREAU FOR PUBLICATION IN THE NEXT AVAILABLE ISSUE OF THE PENNSYLVANIA BULLETIN UPON EXPIRATION OF THE ASSESSMENT.(B) BEGINNING JULY 1, 2025, THE FIXED FEE REQUIRED UNDER SECTION 803-I(B) OF THE "HUMAN SERVICES CODE" SHALL BE THIRTY DOLLARS AND FORTY-SEVEN CENTS ($30.47). THE ASSESSMENT, INCLUDING THE FIXED FEE, SHALL REMAIN SUBJECT TO THE PROVISIONS OF ARTICLE VIII-I OF THE "HUMAN SERVICES CODE."SECTION 2340. INTERMEDIATE CARE FACILITIES FOR PERSONS WITH AN INTELLECTUAL DISABILITY ASSESSMENTS.--THE ASSESSMENTS AUTHORIZED AND IMPLEMENTED UNDER ARTICLE VIII-C OF THE ACT OF JUNE 13, 1967 (P.L.31, NO.21), KNOWN AS THE "HUMAN SERVICES CODE," SHALL CONTINUE AND REMAIN IN EFFECT TO THE EXTENT PERMITTED BY FEDERAL LAW. THE DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES SHALL TRANSMIT NOTICE TO THE LEGISLATIVE REFERENCE BUREAU FOR PUBLICATION IN THE NEXT AVAILABLE ISSUE OF THE PENNSYLVANIA BULLETIN UPON EXPIRATION OF THE ASSESSMENT. THE ASSESSMENTS 20250HB0640PN2052 - 2 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SHALL REMAIN SUBJECT TO THE PROVISIONS OF ARTICLE VIII-C OF THE "HUMAN SERVICES CODE."SECTION 2341. HOSPITAL ASSESSMENTS.--THE ASSESSMENTS AUTHORIZED AND IMPLEMENTED UNDER ARTICLE VIII-E OF THE ACT OF JUNE 13, 1967 (P.L.31, NO.21), KNOWN AS THE "HUMAN SERVICES CODE," SHALL CONTINUE AND REMAIN IN EFFECT TO THE EXTENT PERMITTED BY FEDERAL LAW. THE DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES SHALL TRANSMIT NOTICE TO THE LEGISLATIVE REFERENCE BUREAU FOR PUBLICATION IN THE NEXT AVAILABLE ISSUE OF THE PENNSYLVANIA BULLETIN UPON EXPIRATION OF THE ASSESSMENTS. WITH THE EXCEPTION OF THE EXPIRATION PROVISION UNDER SECTION 1603-O(A) OF THE ACT OF APRIL 9, 1929 (P.L.343, NO.176), KNOWN AS "THE FISCAL CODE," THE ASSESSMENTS SHALL REMAIN SUBJECT TO THE PROVISIONS OF ARTICLE VIII-E OF THE "HUMAN SERVICES CODE" AND SECTION 1603-O OF "THE FISCAL CODE."SECTION 2342. STATEWIDE QUALITY CARE ASSESSMENT.--THE ASSESSMENT AUTHORIZED AND IMPLEMENTED UNDER ARTICLE VIII-G OF THE ACT OF JUNE 13, 1967 (P.L.31, NO.21), KNOWN AS THE "HUMAN SERVICES CODE," SHALL CONTINUE AND REMAIN IN EFFECT TO THE EXTENT PERMITTED BY FEDERAL LAW. THE DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES SHALL TRANSMIT NOTICE TO THE LEGISLATIVE REFERENCE BUREAU FOR PUBLICATION IN THE NEXT AVAILABLE ISSUE OF THE PENNSYLVANIA BULLETIN UPON EXPIRATION OF THE ASSESSMENT. THE ASSESSMENT SHALL REMAIN SUBJECT TO THE PROVISIONS OF ARTICLE VIII-G OF THE "HUMAN SERVICES CODE."SECTION 2343. NURSING FACILITY ASSESSMENT.--THE ASSESSMENT AUTHORIZED IN ARTICLE VIII-A OF THE ACT OF JUNE 13, 1967 (P.L.31, NO.21), KNOWN AS THE "HUMAN SERVICES CODE," SHALL CONTINUE AND REMAIN IN EFFECT TO THE EXTENT PERMITTED BY FEDERAL LAW. THE DEPARTMENT SHALL TRANSMIT NOTICE TO THE LEGISLATIVE 20250HB0640PN2052 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 REFERENCE BUREAU FOR PUBLICATION IN THE NEXT AVAILABLE ISSUE OF THE PENNSYLVANIA BULLETIN UPON EXPIRATION OF THE ASSESSMENT. THE ASSESSMENT SHALL REMAIN SUBJECT TO THE PROVISIONS OF ARTICLE VIII-A OF THE "HUMAN SERVICES CODE."SECTION 2. SECTIONS 2301-A(3) AND (7)(I) AND 2802-E(A) OF THE ACT ARE AMENDED TO READ:Section 2301-A. Powers and duties.The Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs shall have the power and its duty shall be:* * *(3) In accordance with the State plan, to [allocate the responsibility for all] collaborate and coordinate the services, programs and other efforts provided for among the appropriate departments, agencies and other State personnel. The department, through its employees, shall have the power and its duty shall be to [implement] promote compliance with the provisions of the State plan and to coordinate all such efforts.* * *(7) As follows:(i) [To] Within 90 days of the effective date of this subparagraph and by January 31 of each year thereafter, to submit an annual report to the [General Assembly which shall:] chairperson and minority chairperson of the Health and Human Services Committee of the Senate and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Human Services Committee of the House of Representatives. The report shall, at a minimum : (A) Specify the actions taken[,] and services provided [and funds expended, including an 20250HB0640PN2052 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 evaluation], including services and programs provided in accordance with paragraph (3), to expand education, prevention, intervention, treatment and recovery support programs across this Commonwealth, including any evaluations of their effectiveness.(B) Contain the current State plan.(C) Contain the most recent quarterly evaluations by the Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs of the information specified under paragraph (8.2)(i).(D) Specify the actions taken in accordance with section 2303-A.(E) Specify money distributed and expended by the Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs and other appropriate departments, agencies and Commonwealth employees for services, programs and other efforts outlined in the State plan and in accordance with paragraph (3).(F) Contain evaluations of completed grant programs using information reported to the Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs by grantees, including indicators used to measure performance and the reported outcomes.* * *Section 2802-E. Surcharge and fee.(a) Imposition.--(1) The following apply:(i) In addition to the fees imposed under 42 Pa.C.S. § 3733(a.1) (relating to deposits into account), a surcharge of $10 shall be charged and collected by a 20250HB0640PN2052 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 division of the Unified Judicial System.(ii) The additional surcharge under this paragraph shall be deposited into the Judicial Department Operations Augmentation Account established under section 1795.1-E(d) of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code.(iii) This paragraph shall expire [July 31, 2025] December 31, 2027.(2) The following apply:(i) In addition to the fees imposed under 42 Pa.C.S. § 3733(a.1), a surcharge of $11.25 shall be charged and collected by a division of the Unified Judicial System.(ii) The surcharge under this paragraph shall be deposited in the Judicial Department Operations Augmentation Account established under section 1795.1-E(d) of The Fiscal Code.(iii) This paragraph shall expire [July 31, 2025] December 31, 2027.* * *SECTION 3. REPEALS ARE AS FOLLOWS:(1) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY DECLARES THAT THE REPEAL UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) IS NECESSARY TO EFFECTUATE THE ADDITION OF SECTION 2339 OF THE ACT.(2) SECTION 1601-O OF THE ACT OF APRIL 9, 1929 (P.L.343, NO.176), KNOWN AS THE FISCAL CODE, IS REPEALED.(3) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY DECLARES THAT THE REPEAL UNDER PARAGRAPH (4) IS NECESSARY TO EFFECTUATE THE ADDITION OF SECTION 2340 OF THE ACT.(4) SECTION 1602-O OF THE FISCAL CODE IS REPEALED.(5) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY DECLARES THAT THE REPEAL UNDER 20250HB0640PN2052 - 6 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 PARAGRAPH (6) IS NECESSARY TO EFFECTUATE THE ADDITION OF SECTION 2343 OF THE ACT.(6) SECTION 1606-T OF THE FISCAL CODE IS REPEALED.SECTION 4. THE ADDITION OF SECTIONS 2339, 2340, 2341, 2342 AND 2343 SHALL BE RETROACTIVE TO JUNE 30, 2025.Section 2 5. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0640PN2052 - 7 - <--123456